District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.07

Public education program.

The Chief shall carry on a suitable publicity program designed to inform the citizens of the District of the provisions of this unit and the rights and obligations created by it.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 707, 23 DCR 2464
1973 Ed., § 6-1877.
1981 Ed., § 6-2377.